Hawaii statutes.
§435H-2 Establishment of the Hawaii health
insurance exchange; purpose. (a) There is established the Hawaii health
insurance exchange to be known as the Hawaii health connector. The connector
shall not be an agency of the State and shall not be subject to laws or rules
regulating rulemaking, public employment, or public procurement. The connector
shall be a Hawaii nonprofit corporation organized and governed pursuant to
chapter 414D, the Hawaii nonprofit corporations act. The debts and liabilities
of the connector shall not constitute the debts and liabilities of the State.

(b) The purposes of the connector shall
include:

(1) Facilitating the purchase and sale of qualified
plans and qualified dental plans;

(2) Connecting consumers to the information necessary
to make informed health care choices;

(3) Enabling consumers to purchase coverage and
manage health and dental plans electronically; and

(4) Performing any and all other duties required of a
health insurance exchange pursuant to the Federal Act.

(c) The connector shall serve as a
clearinghouse for information on all qualified plans and qualified dental plans
listed or included in the connector.

(d) The connector shall be audited annually by
the state auditor who shall submit the results of each annual audit to the
commissioner and the legislature no later than thirty days after the connector
receives the results. The audit shall comply with standard accounting
practices for reviewing nonprofit corporations. The connector shall provide the
state auditor with the opportunity to inspect and make copies of documents for
the purposes of providing a financial audit for the legislature. The connector
shall retain all annual audits on file, along with any documents, papers,
books, records, and other evidence that is pertinent to its budget and
operations for a period of ten years and shall permit the state auditor, the
commissioner, the state legislature, or their authorized representatives to
have access to, inspect, and make copies of any documents retained pursuant to
this subsection.

(e) The board of directors of the connector
shall submit an annual report to the legislature that shall include the most
recent audit report received pursuant to subsection (d) no later than twenty
days prior to the convening of each regular session of the legislature.

(f) The connector shall offer consumer
assistance in a culturally and linguistically appropriate manner.

(g) The connector shall make qualified plans
and qualified dental plans available to qualified individuals and qualified
employers beginning with effective dates on or before January 1, 2014. [L
2011, c 205, pt of §3; am L 2014, c 233, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next